Tennessee, session 114, HB0354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-6-122, is amended by adding the
following at the end of the section:
The department shall advertise the toll-free telephone service prominently on the home
page of the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0354
001939
- 1 -